Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-245
Wild birds, defined.

Wild birds means the species of birds native to, migrating to or through, or having established free-ranging populations in the State of Nebraska except the English sparrow, the European starling, and the common pigeon.

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 55.